fi: Salaatin lisäkkeen perusainesosa: Juusto tai maitotaloustuote; Kookos; Krutongit tai leipä; Hedelmä; Viljat; Granolapalat; Palkokasvit; Liha; Pähkinät; Kasvipohjainen lihavaihtoehto; Proteiinimurot; Siemenet; Tortillasuikaleet; Vihannekset; Muu
hu: Salátafeltét fő összetevője: Sajt vagy tejtermék; Kókusz; Kruton vagy kenyér; Gyümölcs; Gabonafélék; Granoladarabok; Hüvelyesek; Hús; Diófélék; Növényi húshelyettesítő; Fehérjeroppancs; Magvak; Tortillacsíkok; Zöldségek; Egyéb
sl-SI: Glavna sestavina posipa za solato: Sir ali mlečni izdelki; Kokos; Krutoni ali kruh; Sadje; Žita; Koščki granole; Stročnice; Meso; Oreščki; Rastlinska alternativa mesu; Beljakovinski hrustljavčki; Semena; Trakovi tortilje; Zelenjava; Drugo
hr-HR: Osnovni sastojak za preljev za salatu: Sir ili mliječni proizvodi; Kokos; Krutoni ili kruh; Voće; Žitarice; Komadići granole; Mahunarke; Meso; Orašasti plodovi; Biljna alternativa za meso; Proteinski čips; Sjemenke; Trakice tortilje; Povrće; Ostalo
sv: Basingrediens för salladstillbehör: Ost eller mejeri; Kokos; Krutonger eller bröd; Frukt; Spannmål; Granolabitar; Baljväxter; Kött; Nötter; Växtbaserat köttalternativ; Proteincrisp; Frön; Tortillastrimlor; Grönsaker; Övrigt
lt-LT: Salotų priedo pagrindinis ingredientas: Sūris arba pieno produktai; Kokosas; Skrebučiai arba duona; Vaisiai; Grūdai; Granolos gabalėliai; Ankštiniai; Mėsa; Riešutai; Augalinė mėsos alternatyva; Baltyminiai traškučiai; Sėklos; Tortilijų juostelės; Daržovės; Kita
it: Ingrediente base del condimento per insalata: Formaggio o latticini; Cocco; Crostini o pane; Frutta; Cereali; Granola; Legumi; Carne; Frutta a guscio; Alternativa alla carne a base vegetale; Fiocchi proteici; Semi; Strisce di tortilla; Verdure; Altro
fr: Base de la garniture pour salade: Fromage ou produits laitiers; Noix de coco; Croûtons ou pain; Fruits; Céréales; Pépites de granola; Légumineuses; Viande; Noix; Alternative végétale à la viande; Croustilles protéinées; Graines; Lanières de tortilla; Légumes; Autre
ja: サラダのトッピングのベース材料: チーズまたは乳製品; ココナッツ; クルトンまたはパン; フルーツ; 穀物; グラノーラクラスター; 豆類; 肉; ナッツ; 植物由来の代替肉; プロテインクリスプ; 種子; トルティーヤストリップ; 野菜; その他
ro-RO: Ingredient de bază pentru toppingul de salată: Brânză sau lactate; Nucă de cocos; Crutoane sau pâine; Fructe; Cereale; Bulgări de granola; Leguminoase; Carne; Nuci; Alternativă vegetală la carne; Crisps proteice; Semințe; Fâșii de tortilla; Legume; Altele
tr: Salata sosu ana malzemesi: Peynir veya süt ürünleri; Hindistan cevizi; Kruton veya ekmek; Meyve; Tahıl; Granola parçaları; Baklagiller; Et; Kuruyemiş; Bitki bazlı et alternatifi; Protein gevreği; Çekirdek/tohum; Tortilla şeritleri; Sebze; Diğer
zh-TW: 沙拉配料基底成分: 起司或乳製品; 椰子; 麵包丁或麵包; 水果; 穀物; 燕麥脆塊; 豆類與莢果; 肉類; 堅果; 植物肉替代品; 蛋白脆片; 種子; 墨西哥脆條; 蔬菜; 其他
de: Grundzutat des Salat-Toppings: Käse oder Milchprodukte; Kokosnuss; Croutons oder Brot; Frucht; Getreide; Müsli-Cluster; Hülsenfrüchte; Fleisch; Nüsse; Pflanzenbasierte Fleischalternative; Protein-Crisps; Samen; Tortilla-Streifen; Gemüse; Sonstige
ru: Базовый ингредиент топпинга для салата: Сыр или молочные продукты; Кокос; Гренки или хлеб; Фрукты; Злаки; Кластеры гранолы; Бобовые; Мясо; Орехи; Растительная альтернатива мясу; Протеиновые криспы; Семена; Полоски тортильи; Овощи; Другое
nb: Baseingrediens i salattopping: Ost eller meieriprodukter; Kokos; Krutonger eller brød; Frukt; Korn; Granolaklynger; Belgfrukter; Kjøtt; Nøtter; Plantebasert kjøttalternativ; Protein-crisps; Frø; Tortillastrimler; Grønnsaker; Annet
pl: Składnik bazowy posypki do sałatki: Ser lub nabiał; Kokos; Grzanki lub chleb; Owoce; Zboża; Kawałki granoli; Rośliny strączkowe; Mięso; Orzechy; Roślinna alternatywa dla mięsa; Chrupki białkowe; Nasiona; Paski tortilli; Warzywa; Inne
ko: 샐러드 토핑 기본 재료: 치즈 또는 유제품; 코코넛; 크루통 또는 빵; 과일; 곡물; 그래놀라 클러스터; 콩 및 콩류; 육류; 견과류; 식물성 대체육; 단백질 크리스프; 씨앗류; 토르티야 스트립; 채소; 기타
vi: Nguyên liệu cơ bản dùng để trang trí salad: Phô mai hoặc sản phẩm từ sữa; Dừa; Crouton hoặc bánh mì; Trái cây; Ngũ cốc; Cụm hạt granola; Các loại đậu; Thịt; Các loại hạt; Sản phẩm thay thế thịt từ thực vật; Bánh giòn protein; Hạt giống; Vỉa ngô nướng dạng sợi; Rau củ; Khác
da: Ingrediens i salattopping-base: Ost eller mejeriprodukt; Kokos; Croutoner eller brød; Frugt; Korn; Granola-klynger; Bælgfrugter; Kød; Nødder; Plantebaseret kødalternativ; Proteincrisps; Frø; Tortillastrimler; Grøntsager; Andet
bg-BG: Основна съставка на салатния топинг: Сирене или млечни продукти; Кокос; Крутони или хляб; Плодове; Зърнени култури; Гранола хапки; Бобови култури; Месо; Ядки; Растителна алтернатива на месо; Протеинови хрупкави парченца; Семена; Тортила лентички; Зеленчуци; Друго
es: Ingrediente base para aderezo de ensalada: Queso o lácteos; Coco; Crutones o pan; Fruta; Granos; Trozos de granola; Legumbres y semillas; Carne; Frutos secos; Alternativa de carne de origen vegetal; Crujientes de proteína; Semillas; Tiras de tortilla; Verduras; Otro
pt-PT: Ingrediente base do acompanhamento para salada: Queijo ou laticínios; Coco; Croutons ou pão; Fruta; Cereais; Aglomerados de granola; Leguminosas; Carne; Frutos secos; Alternativa vegetal à carne; Crocantes de proteína; Sementes; Tiras de tortilha; Legumes; Outro
cs: Základní složka salátové zálivky: Sýr nebo mléčné výrobky; Kokos; Krutony nebo chléb; Ovoce; Obiloviny; Kousky granoly; Luštěniny; Maso; Ořechy; Rostlinná alternativa masa; Proteinové křupky; Semínka; Tortillové proužky; Zelenina; Jiné
el: Βασικό συστατικό για γαρνιτούρα σαλάτας: Τυρί ή γαλακτοκομικά; Καρύδα; Κρουτόν ή ψωμί; Φρούτα; Σιτηρά; Μπουκιές γκρανόλας; Όσπρια; Κρέας; Ξηροί καρποί; Φυτικό υποκατάστατο κρέατος; Τραγανές μπουκιές πρωτεΐνης; Σπόροι; Λωρίδες τορτίγιας; Λαχανικά; Άλλο
th: ส่วนผสมหลักสำหรับโรยหน้าสลัด: ชีสหรือผลิตภัณฑ์นม; มะพร้าว; กรูตองหรือขนมปัง; ผลไม้; ธัญพืช; กราโนลาแบบก้อน; พืชตระกูลถั่ว; เนื้อสัตว์; ถั่ว; ผลิตภัณฑ์ทดแทนเนื้อสัตว์จากพืช; โปรตีนอบกรอบ; เมล็ดพืช; แผ่นตอร์ติญ่าหั่นเส้น; ผัก; อื่นๆ
en: Salad topping base ingredient: Cheese or dairy; Coconut; Croutons or bread; Fruit; Grains; Granola clusters; Legumes and pulses; Meat; Nuts; Plant-based meat alternative; Protein crisps; Seeds; Tortilla strips; Vegetables; Other
zh-CN: 沙拉顶料基底成分: 奶酪或乳制品; 椰子; 面包块或面包; 水果; 谷物; 燕麦脆; 豆类和豆荚; 肉类; 坚果; 植物肉替代品; 蛋白脆片; 种子; 墨西哥薄饼条; 蔬菜; 其他
pt-BR: Cobertura para salada ingrediente base: Queijo ou laticínios; Coco; Croutons ou pão; Frutas; Grãos; Aglomerados de granola; Legumes e leguminosas; Carne; Oleaginosas; Alternativa à carne à base de plantas; Crispies de proteína; Sementes; Tiras de tortilha; Vegetais; Outros
nl: Saladetopping basisingrediënt: Kaas of zuivel; Kokos; Croutons of brood; Fruit; Granen; Granolaclusters; Peulvruchten; Vlees; Noten; Plantaardig vleesalternatief; Proteïne-crisps; Zaden; Tortillareepjes; Groenten; Overige
sk-SK: Základná prísada na šalátovú zálievku: Syr alebo mliečne výrobky; Kokos; Krutóny alebo chlieb; Ovocie; Obilniny; Kúsky granoly; Strukoviny; Mäso; Orechy; Rastlinná alternatíva mäsa; Proteínové lupienky; Semienka; Tortillové prúžky; Zelenina; Iné